Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 37 Best and Brightest Scholarship Fund

16-37-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 45; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

16-37-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 275, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.